California statutes. Education Code
(b) The Equity Leads selected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall demonstrate a willingness and capacity to do all of the following:

(1) Work collaboratively with the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, the department, and other lead agencies in the system of support to advance the purpose of the statewide system of support specified in subdivision (b) of Section 52059.5.

(2) Partner with other subject matter experts across the state, including, but not limited to, the Community Engagement Initiative, 21st Century California School Leadership Academy, California Community Schools Partnership Program Regional Technical Assistance Center, Local Literacy Lead Agencies, and Statewide System of Support for Expanded Learning.

(3) Develop and disseminate resources on effective practices for analyzing programs, identifying barriers and opportunities, and implementing actions and services to meet the identified needs of all pupils, including by addressing racial disparities.

(4) Understand the local control and accountability plan and how to use the local control and accountability plan for strategic planning, including, but not limited to, by:

(A) Identifying and analyzing available and relevant data to understand pupil needs and helping practitioners, educators, and interestholders understand the data.

(B) Assisting practitioners in implementing and monitoring changes to practice to meet the needs of all pupils, including by addressing racial disparities in opportunities and outcomes and aligning to the technical assistance provided pursuant to Sections 47607.3, 52071, 52071.5, 52072, and 52072.5.

(C) Including diverse and underrepresented pupils, families, and communities in decisionmaking processes in school settings.

(5) Understanding the history of racial inequities in California, including, but not limited to, past policies related to segregation, immigration, education, and public safety and incarceration, and how it currently impacts
 pupils in California.

(c) The Equity Leads shall have all of the following responsibilities:

(1) Partnering with the local educational agencies, prioritizing those with schools receiving Local Control Funding Formula Equity Multiplier funding pursuant to Section 42238.024, to analyze programs, identify barriers and opportunities, and implement actions and services to meet the identified needs of all pupils, including by addressing racial disparities. This shall include enhancing and expanding existing work in these areas.

(2) Supporting the work of local educational agencies, prioritizing those with schools receiving Local Control Funding Formula Equity Multiplier funding pursuant to Section 42238.024, in developing and implementing programs and supports that address racial disparities in opportunities and academic
 outcomes.

(3) Identifying existing resources, including support for educator preparation; recruitment, retention, and professional development activities; instructional coaching; and other efforts currently available to address disparities, including racial disparities, in pupil outcomes, and sharing these resources with local educational agencies, prioritizing those receiving Local Control Funding Formula Equity Multiplier funding pursuant to Section 42238.024.

(4) Monitoring the impact of the implementation of local control and accountability plan goals pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (e) of Section 52064, and reporting on the best practices developed and outcomes.

(d) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) is hereby
 appropriated to the department from the General Fund to be awarded to local educational agencies serving as Equity Leads pursuant to this section.

(e) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made by subdivision (d) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 79.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

52074.

(a) The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence is hereby established.

(b) The purpose of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence is to advise and assist school districts, county superintendents of schools, and charter schools in achieving the goals set forth in a local control and accountability plan adopted pursuant to this article. The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall achieve this purpose by facilitating continuous improvement for local educational agencies within California’s system of public school support.

(c) The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall be governed by a board consisting of the following five members:

(1) The Superintendent or the Superintendent’s designee.

(2) The president of the state board or the president of the state board’s designee.

(3) A county superintendent of schools appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(4) A teacher appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(5) A superintendent of a school district appointed by the Governor.

(d) The governing board of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall select, and direct the administrative agent provided for in subdivision (e) to hire, the executive director of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and provide policy and program
 direction.

(e) The department, in consultation with the executive director of the state board and with the approval of the Department of Finance, shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with a local educational agency, or consortium of local educational agencies, to serve as the administrative agent for the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence. The administrative agent shall operate all aspects of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence in accordance with the terms of the memorandum of understanding entered into with the state, applicable statutes, and the policy and program direction of the governing board of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence.

(f) Pursuant to the policy and program direction of the governing board of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, the administrative agent shall contract with
 individuals, local educational agencies, or organizations with the expertise, experience, and a record of success to carry out the purposes of this article. The areas of expertise, experience, and record of success shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) State priorities as described in subdivision (d) of Section 52060, including the state and local indicators developed for the California School Dashboard pursuant to Section 52064.5.

(2) Improving the quality of teaching.

(3) Improving the quality of school district and schoolsite leadership.

(4) Successfully addressing the needs of special pupil populations, including, but not limited to, English learners, pupils eligible to receive a free or reduced-price meal, pupils in
 foster care, and individuals with exceptional needs.

(g) (1) The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence may accept a request or referral to advise and assist a school district, county superintendent of schools, or charter school pursuant to paragraph (2) or in either of the following circumstances:

(A) If the county superintendent of schools of the county in which the school district or charter school is located determines, following the provision of technical assistance pursuant to Section 52071 or 47607.3, as applicable, and the geographic lead agency of that county identified pursuant to Section 52073 agrees, that the advice and assistance of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence is necessary to help the school district or charter school accomplish the goals described in the local control and accountability plan adopted
 pursuant to this article.

(B) If the Superintendent determines that the advice and assistance of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence is necessary to help the school district, county superintendent of schools, or charter school accomplish the goals set forth in the local control and accountability plan adopted pursuant to this article.

(2) (A) If a school district receives an emergency apportionment pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320) of Chapter 3 of Part 24 of Division 3, the school district shall be deemed to have been referred to the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence.

(B) If the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence provides assistance to a school district referred pursuant to this paragraph, the California Collaborative for
 Educational Excellence shall conduct a systemic review of the school district to identify needs and strategies to improve pupil academic achievement, including, but not limited to, needs identified pursuant to Sections 52052, 52064.5, and 52071. Based on the results of the systemic review, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall coordinate and facilitate the assistance provided to the school district by governmental agencies to provide coherent and effective support consistent with the purpose of the statewide system of support specified in Section 52059.5. The governmental agencies may include, among others, the department, the local county superintendent, the applicable geographic lead agency, and the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team. It is the intent of the Legislature that no single governmental agency providing assistance in partnership with other governmental agencies bear the full cost of assistance.

(3) Outside of the processes described in paragraphs (1) and (2), only a school district, county office of education, or charter school that is eligible for technical assistance pursuant to Section 52071, 52071.5, or 47607.3 may request the advice and assistance of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence. A school district, county office of education, or charter school that requests advice and assistance pursuant to this paragraph shall reimburse the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence for the cost of those services pursuant to authority provided in the annual Budget Act.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team established pursuant to Section 42127.8 may request the advice or assistance of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and shall reimburse the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence for the
 cost of those services pursuant to authority provided in the annual Budget Act.

(h) To the extent authority is provided in the annual Budget Act, a school district at risk of qualifying for state intervention pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52072 shall have priority for direct technical assistance from the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence.

(i) In addition to the functions described in subdivision (g), the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall do both of the following:

(1) Facilitate professional development activities that increase the capacity of local educational agencies to improve pupil outcomes in alignment with state priorities pursuant to Section 52060 and to improve performance on the state and local indicators developed for the California School Dashboard
 pursuant to Section 52064.5. The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall provide professional development in partnership with state professional associations, nonprofit organizations, and public agencies. The governing board of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall determine the extent of the training that is necessary to comply with this paragraph.

(2) Produce a professional development training calendar, to be posted on the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence’s internet website, that publicizes all of the professional development activities offered pursuant to paragraph (1) at the local, regional, and state levels.

(j) The individuals with whom the administrative agent enters into employment contracts to carry out the purposes of this article shall be deemed employees of the administrative agent and eligible for
 participation in either the State Teachers’ Retirement System or the Public Employees’ Retirement System, as appropriate to the nature of the work to be performed by the employees.

(k) Receipt of any revenues not appropriated by the Legislature to the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, including revenues received for assistance provided pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (g), shall be subject to approval by the governing board of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence. The governing board of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall ensure that all activities, regardless of fund source, are aligned with the purpose of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, as described in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 80.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

52075.

(a) A complaint that a school district, county superintendent of schools, or charter school has not complied with the requirements of this article or Sections 47606.5 and 47607.3, as applicable, may be filed with a school district, county superintendent of schools, or charter school pursuant to the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) Consistent with subdivision (d) of Section 4600 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, a complaint may be filed by any member of the public, including anyone electing to file anonymously, if the complaint provides evidence or information leading to evidence to support an allegation of noncompliance with the
 requirements of this article.

(c) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a school district, county superintendent of schools, or charter school may appeal the decision to the Superintendent and shall receive a written appeal decision within 60 days of the Superintendent’s receipt of the appeal.

(d) If a school district, county superintendent of schools, or charter school finds merit in a complaint, or the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, the school district, county superintendent of schools, or charter school shall provide a remedy to all affected pupils, parents, and guardians.

(e) If the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal of a complaint filed against a school district related to a local control and accountability plan approved by a county superintendent of schools, or finds merit in an appeal
 against a county superintendent of schools related to the approval of a school district’s local control and accountability plan, the Superintendent shall provide technical assistance to the county superintendent of schools focused on improving the county superintendent of schools’ review and approval of local control and accountability plans.

(f) Information regarding the requirements of this article shall be included in the annual notification distributed to pupils, parents and guardians, employees, and other interested parties pursuant to Section 4622 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations or any successor regulation.

(g) School districts, county superintendents of schools, and charter schools shall establish local policies and procedures to implement the provisions of this section on or before June 30, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 78.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

52076.

Notwithstanding any other law, this article shall not be subject to waiver by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or by the Superintendent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 103.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

52077.

If any activities authorized pursuant to this article and implementing regulations are found to be a state reimbursable mandate pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution, funding provided for school districts and county offices of education pursuant to Sections 2574, 2575, 42238.02, and 42238.03 shall be used to directly offset any mandated costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 103.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Bilingual Education [52160. - 52202.]



  ARTICLE 3. Bilingual-Bicultural Education Act of 1976 [52160. - 52178.]

52160.

This article shall be known and may be referred to as the Chacon-Moscone Bilingual-Bicultural Education Act of 1976.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

52161.

The Legislature finds that there are more than 288,000 school age children who are limited English proficient and who do not have the English language skills necessary to benefit from instruction only in English at a level substantially equivalent to pupils whose primary language is English. Their lack of English language communication skills presents an obstacle to such pupils’ right to an equal educational opportunity which can be removed by instruction and training in the pupils’ primary languages while such pupils are learning English. The Legislature recognizes that the school dropout rate is excessive among pupils of limited English proficiency. This
 represents a tremendous loss in human resources and in potential personal income and tax revenues. Furthermore, high rates of joblessness among these dropouts contribute to the unemployment burden of the state.

The Legislature recognizes that a critical need exists for teaching and administrative personnel qualified in the bilingual and crosscultural skills necessary to the instruction of the limited-English-proficient population in the state’s school districts. Therefore, the Legislature directs school districts to provide for in-service programs to qualify existing and future personnel in the bilingual and crosscultural skills necessary to serve the pupils of limited English proficiency of this state. Furthermore, the Legislature intends that the public institutions of higher education establish programs to qualify teachers and administrators in the bilingual and crosscultural skills necessary to serve these pupils.

The
 Legislature finds and declares that the primary goal of all programs under this article is, as effectively and efficiently as possible, to develop in each child fluency in English. The programs shall also provide positive reinforcement of the self-image of participating pupils, promote crosscultural understanding, and provide equal opportunity for academic achievement, including, when necessary, academic instruction through the primary language.

It is the purpose of this article to require California school districts to offer bilingual learning opportunities to each pupil of limited English proficiency enrolled in the public schools, and to provide adequate supplemental financial support to achieve such purpose. Insofar as the individual pupil is concerned, participation in bilingual programs is voluntary on the part of the parent or guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 5.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52162.

The State Board of Education shall adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary for the effective administration of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 6.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52163.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this section shall govern the construction of this article.

(a) “Basic bilingual education” is a system of instruction that builds upon the language skills of the pupil and that consists of, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A structured English language development component with daily instruction leading to the acquisition of English language proficiency, including English reading and writing skills.

(2) A structured primary language component with daily basic skills instruction in the primary language for the purpose of sustaining achievement in basic subject areas until the transfer to English is made.

As the pupil develops English language skills, the amount of instruction offered through English shall increase.

(b) “Bilingual-bicultural education” is a system of instruction that uses two languages, one of which is English, as a means of instruction. It is a means of instruction that builds upon and expands the existing language skills of each participating pupil, that will enable the pupil to achieve competency in both languages.

This instruction shall include all of the following:

(1) Daily instruction in English language development that shall include:

(A) Listening and speaking skills.

(B) Reading and writing skills; formal instruction in reading and writing of English shall be introduced when appropriate criteria are met.

(2) Language development in the pupil’s primary language, including oral and literacy skills.

(3) Reading in the pupil’s primary language.

(4) Selected subjects taught in the pupil’s primary language.

(5) Development of an
 understanding of the history and culture of California and the United States, as well as an understanding of customs and values of the cultures associated with the languages being taught.

(c) (1) “Experimental bilingual programs” are:

(A) Innovative programs that are consistent with the provisions of this article, the requirements for bilingual teaching personnel pursuant to Section 52165, and the requirements for English language and primary language development pursuant to this section. Innovative programs may include new management approaches, greater emphasis on team teaching, or other appropriate improvements that expand the learning opportunities of pupils of limited English proficiency. Unless waivers of code sections are required, project approval of the state board is not required. A description of each innovative program shall be included with the
 consolidated application for program funding and an annual evaluation of the programs shall be included in the multiple-funded program evaluation required pursuant to Section 33403.

(B) Planned variation programs for the purpose of comparing and improving language development programs for pupils of limited English proficiency. A primary focus shall be on appropriate instruction for pupils of limited English proficiency whose English skills are superior to their skills in their primary language.

A focus may also be placed upon situations in which the number of pupils who, in accordance with Section 52165, would be required to receive instruction pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 52163, is substantially smaller than the census indicated for the previous year, in which case all pupils of limited English proficiency shall receive instruction through individual learning programs during the
 preparation of the district’s proposal and the consideration of the proposal by the state board. The programs shall be authorized by the state board in up to 300 classrooms in 1982–83 and up to 700 classrooms in 1983–84 and each school year thereafter in districts that are representative of the state both geographically and by size. Not more than 30 classrooms in 1982–83 and 50 classrooms in 1983–84, that may or may not be in another school, shall be approved in any one district. The programs shall not result in segregation. For districts proposing a planned variation program, the staffing requirements of Section 52165 may be partially or totally waived by the state board provided that the district has an inadequate number of certified bilingual teachers, that certified bilingual teachers are not replaced, that present level of effort is not reduced, and that the proposed language development program is appropriate. For each participating classroom there shall be another similar classroom in the district
 that has fully implemented and is in compliance with the other provisions of this article.

(2) Proposals for planned variation programs shall include, but need not be limited to:

(A) A clear statement of the purposes, goals, and objectives for planned variation programs and projected outcomes.

(B) A delineated management, staffing, and instructional plan.

(C) Pupil identification, diagnosis, and assessment procedures.

(D) Evidence of qualified bilingual and other instructional staff with demonstrated competence in language development, bicultural or multicultural knowledge of participating pupils, and instructional methodologies.

(E) Documented parent and community participation and support.

(F) Use of state and federal funding, where applicable.

(G) Evaluation component that controls for instructional treatments, instructional engaged time, staffing, pupil language characteristics, achievement, attendance, and related data.

(H) For purposes of this subdivision, if formal action upon a proposal for a planned variation program is not taken by the state board on or before the second regular meeting of the state board following the receipt of a complete and documented proposal, the proposal shall be deemed approved for the remainder of the school year.

Proposals that meet the requirements of this subdivision shall be approved by the state board in accordance with standards established in
 subdivision (b) of Section 52820.

Proposals may be approved annually for a second, third, or fourth year based upon a demonstration of compliance with planned variation program requirements.

(3) The department shall include in its annual report to the Legislature submitted pursuant to Sections 33405 and 52171.6 the number and nature of experimental bilingual and planned variation programs and progress of participating pupils.

(4) Nothing contained in this subdivision shall be construed to permit the operation of experimental bilingual and planned variation programs contrary to the purposes or intent of this article and other state or federal statutes and regulations promulgated for and on behalf of pupils of limited English proficiency. The primary goal of all programs shall be to teach the pupil English.

(d) “Secondary level language development program” is a program in grades 7 to 12 that provides a prescriptive English language program that systematically develops a pupil’s listening and speaking skills, knowledge of linguistic and grammatical structure leading to proficiency in reading and writing English. The prescriptive English language program shall be based on the diagnosis of a pupil’s language skills pursuant to Sections 52164 and 52164.1 and shall be conducted as an integral instructional program of English curriculum for not less than one full period a day or its equivalent for the purpose of providing pupils with minimum English language competencies pursuant to subdivision (e). The primary goal of the programs shall be to teach pupils the English language.

In addition to the prescriptive English language program required by this subdivision, a secondary level language development program
 shall provide primary language instructional support to sustain academic achievement in nonelective content subject areas required for high school graduation consistent with current law.

Instruction in a secondary level language development program shall be provided either by a language development specialist, or by a certified bilingual-crosscultural teacher, who has received the recommendation of the local superintendent of schools verifying in writing that the teacher is competent and qualified to teach an English-as-a-second-language component, as measured by the district’s personnel evaluation system.

School districts offering an instructional program pursuant to this subdivision shall not be required to provide a secondary level individual learning program, as defined in subdivision (e), but shall be required to maintain records documenting all parental notices and of the continuing evaluation of pupil needs and
 services.

A school district may make a secondary level language development program available to pupils enrolled in grade 6 whenever that grade is maintained by the district in a middle school comprised of any of grades 6, 7, 8, or 9.

(e) “Secondary level individual learning program” is an individualized systematic program of instruction that meets the needs of limited-English-proficient pupils and builds upon their language skills in order to develop proficiency in English. This program shall be offered in a manner consistent with the United States Supreme Court decision in Lau v. Nichols (414 U.S. 563), the Equal Education Opportunities Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1701 et seq.) and federal regulations promulgated pursuant to those court decisions and federal statutes. The primary goal of the programs shall be to teach the pupil English.

(f) “Elementary level individual learning program” is any program of instruction for a pupil of limited English proficiency in which any one of the three program options described in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) is individualized to meet the needs of the pupil of limited English proficiency and is offered in a manner consistent with the requirements of this article. Instruction shall be offered in a manner consistent with the United States Supreme Court decision in Lau v. Nichols (414 U.S. 563), the Equal Educational Opportunities Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1701 et seq.), and federal regulations promulgated pursuant to those court decisions and federal statutes. The primary goal of the programs shall be to teach the pupil English.

(g) “Primary language” is a language other than English that is the language the pupil first learned or the language that is spoken in the pupil’s home.

(h) “Bilingual-crosscultural teacher” means a person who (1) holds a valid, regular California teaching credential and (2) holds either a bilingual-crosscultural certificate of proficiency or other credential in bilingual education authorized by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing or a bilingual-crosscultural specialist credential. The person shall be fluent in the primary language and familiar with the cultural heritage of limited-English-proficiency pupils in the bilingual classes he or she conducts. The person shall have a professional demonstrated working knowledge of the methodologies that are necessary to effectively educate those pupils.

(i) “Bilingual-crosscultural teacher aide” means an aide fluent in both English and the primary language of the pupil or pupils of limited English proficiency in a bilingual-bicultural program. The aide shall be familiar with the cultural
 heritage of pupils of limited English proficiency in the bilingual classes to which he or she is assigned.

(j) “State board” means the State Board of Education.

(k) “Superintendent” means the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(l) “Basic skills” means language arts, including, but not limited to, reading and writing, and mathematics.

(m) “Pupils of limited English proficiency” are pupils who do not have the clearly developed English language skills of comprehension, speaking, reading, and writing necessary to receive instruction only in English at a level substantially equivalent to pupils of the same age or grade whose primary language is English. The determination of which pupils are pupils of limited English proficiency shall be made in
 accordance with the procedures specified in Sections 52164 and 52164.1. Pupils who have no proficiency in their primary language are not included within this definition.

(n) “Pupils of fluent English proficiency” are pupils whose English proficiency is comparable to that of the majority of pupils, of the same age or grade, whose primary language is English.

(o) “Department” means the State Department of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 53, Sec. 17.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

52163.5.

Each of the program options defined in subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 52163 shall include structured activities which promote the pupil’s positive self-image and crosscultural understanding.

The Legislature recognizes that language development is a continuum and that pupils in the same classroom may have varying levels of English and primary language skills. The individualized instruction for each pupil, pursuant to all of the program options, shall be based on a continuing evaluation of the pupil’s progress by the classroom teacher, and by others, as appropriate. An English development
 component is required for all participating pupils. Pupils with greater strength in their primary language shall receive instruction in academic subjects through the primary language as long as such instruction is needed to sustain academic achievement. As pupils develop the skills which allow them to learn more effectively in English, more of their instruction shall be through the English language. A primary language component shall be provided as specified in subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 52163, but shall be less extensive as the pupil progresses into English.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 8.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52163.6.

The Legislature recognizes that for many languages there is a shortage of primary language textbooks, curriculum, teacher training programs, and bilingual personnel. The requirement for reading in the primary language may be waived by the board if the district documents the lack of available materials, personnel, and training programs. The department shall maintain a list of available curriculum materials and teacher training programs in all appropriate languages, to verify the waiver requests. The waiver is renewable yearly. Each waiver request shall be signed by the chairperson of the district bilingual committee. The waiver does not eliminate the
 requirement for primary oral language development.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 9.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52164.

Each school district shall ascertain not later than the first day of March of each year, under regulations prescribed by the State Board of Education, the total number of pupils of limited English proficiency within the district, and shall classify them according to their primary language, age, and grade level. This count shall be known as the “census of pupils of limited English proficiency” and shall consist of a determination of the primary language of each pupil enrolled in the school district and an assessment of the language skills of all pupils whose primary language is other than English.

The census shall
 be taken by individual, actual count, and not by estimates or samplings. All pupils of limited English proficiency, including migrant and special education pupils, shall be counted. Special language assessment instruments, designated by the superintendent and in compliance with the requirements of subdivision (j) of Section 56001, may be used for special education pupils. The results of this census shall be reported to the Department of Education not later than the 30th day of April of each year. The previous census shall be updated to include new enrollees and to eliminate pupils who are no longer pupils of limited English proficiency and pupils who no longer attend school in the district, and shall be reported pursuant to Section 52164.1. Census data gathered in one school year shall be used to plan the number of bilingual classrooms to be established in the following school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 10.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52164.1.

The superintendent, with the approval of the State Board of Education, shall prescribe census-taking methods, applicable to all school districts in the state, which shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(a) A determination of the primary language of each pupil enrolled in the school district. The primary language of new pupils shall be determined as they enroll. Once determined, the primary language need not be redetermined unless the parent or guardian claims there is an error. Home language determinations are required only once, unless the results are disputed by a
 parent or guardian.

(b) An assessment of the language skills of all pupils whose primary language is other than English. All the skills listed in subdivision (m) of Section 52163 shall be assessed, except that reading and writing skills need not be assessed for pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 and 2. For those pupils who, on the basis of oral language proficiency alone, are clearly limited English proficient, assessment of reading and writing skills shall be necessary only to the extent required by subdivision (c). This assessment, which shall be made as pupils enroll in the district, shall determine whether such pupils are fluent in English or are of limited English proficiency.

(c) For those pupils identified as being of limited English proficiency, a further assessment shall be made to determine the pupil’s primary language proficiency, including speaking, comprehension,
 reading, and writing, to the extent assessment instruments are available. Parallel forms of the instruments used to determine English proficiency shall be used, if available. The results of the parallel assessment shall determine the extent and sequence in which English and the primary language will be used in the instruction of basic skills.

A diagnostic assessment in the language designated for basic skills instruction measuring speaking, comprehension, reading, and writing, shall be administered for instructional use at the district level. Such diagnostic assessment shall be updated as necessary to provide a curriculum meeting the individual needs of each pupil of limited English proficiency.

If the assessment conducted pursuant to this subdivision indicates that the pupil has no proficiency in the primary language, further assessment of the pupil’s primary language skills including consultation with the pupil’s parents
 or guardians, the classroom teacher, the pupil, or others who are familiar with the pupil’s language ability in various environments shall be conducted. If this detailed assessment indicates that the pupil has no proficiency in his or her primary language, then the pupil is not entitled to the protection of this article.

The diagnostic assessment process shall be completed within 90 days after the date of the pupil’s initial enrollment and shall be performed in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board.
